src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-I-I-sokapii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - soka'pii - ok : # -m inanimate intransitive verb, good AEW NA1
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikssoka'piiwa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Pl: iikssoka'piiyi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Sg+INTERR: iikssoka'piiwaatsiksi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+0Pl+INTERR: iikssoka'piiwaistsaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+PRO+3/0: iikssoka'piiyaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Ind+PRO+0Pl: iikssoka'piiwaistsi

     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Sg: otsiikssoka'pissi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Pl: otsiikssoka'pissi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Sg+PRO+3/0: otsiikssoka'pissiyaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Cnj+0Pl+PRO+0Pl: otsiikssoka'pissiwaistsi

     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Sg: iikssoka'piisi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Pl: iikssoka'piisi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Sg+PRO+3/0: iikssoka'piisiyaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Sbj+0Pl+PRO+0Pl: iikssoka'piisiwaistsi

     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Sg: iikssoka'piiwahtopi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Pl: iikssoka'piiwahtopiyi
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Sg+PRO+3/0: iikssoka'piiwahtopiyaawa
     PV/iik+soka'pii+VII+Irr+0Pl+PRO+0Pl: iikssoka'piiwahtopiyiwaistsi
